Louisiana, session 2026, HB190.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 2317.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2317.2. Software and computer programs
Any person who designs, develops, licenses, manufactures, or sells a
computer program or software that provides an interactive or personalized user
experience based on the user's data or information owes a duty to exercise reasonable
care in the design, development, licensing, manufacture, or sale of the computer
program or software.
Revision Comments - 2026
This Article does not foreclose the availability of any other cause of action
or theory of liability pursuant to this Code or other applicable law, including the
Louisiana Products Liability Act, R.S. 9:2800.51 et seq.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-643 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 190